Massachusetts, session 194th, H1648.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the following new
chapter:
An Act to provide for the training, continuing training, and education of judges, and other
legal hearing officers.
1.) Massachusetts, as a leader in legal reform, and legal systems, has accomplished many
important reforms, and contributed to the general structures, and processes of law. This includes,
of course, case study law itself, many consumer protections, and many other innovations.
of 2

2.) Therefore, this Statute, establishes, and encourages, a robust formal framework, for
the training of all judges, and other legal hearing officers. In a rapidly changing society,
everyone, including legal officials, are especially challenged by changes in technology, social
viewpoints, societal consensus, business operations and circumstances, and legal doctrines and
operations.
3.) The Attorney General of Massachusetts, in consultation with the Board of Bar
Overseers, and other appropriate individuals, and organizations, is empowered, to establish
Judicial Training: defined as suitable judicial training, judicial continuing education, training and
education for all judicial, and legal hearing officers of the Commonwealth, including Judges,
Magistrates, Hearing Officers, and those individuals who are members of Boards and
Commissions, which make regulatory, and legally-binding decisions.
4.) All individuals, meeting the requirements of this Act, shall receive specified initial
training, at the beginning of their appointments, and regular update training, on a yearly basis, as
specified in such needed regulations, as the Attorney General, shall create, and monitor, in
conjunction with the relevant supervising justices, of each appropriately defined judicial system.
of 2